Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 31

Agricultural Production Inputs

43-31-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Agricultural Production Input Law.”

Acts 1986, ch. 922, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Comparative Legislation. Agricultural production input security interest:

Ala. Code § 7-9-203 et seq.

Ark. Code § 4-9-203.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 426.170.

Miss. Code Ann. § 75-9-307.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-655 et seq.

Collateral References. 3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 34 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 65-73.

Agriculture
12.

43-31-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural chemical” means fertilizers or agricultural chemicals that are applied to crops or to land that is used for raising crops, including fertilizer material, plant amendment, plant food and soil amendment, and pesticide as defined in § 43-8-102;

“Agricultural production input” means crop production inputs;

“Crop production input” means agricultural chemicals, seeds, petroleum products, the custom application of agricultural chemicals and seeds;

“Debtor” means a farmer who is or has requested financial assistance from a lender through a supplier;

“Lender” means a person in the business of lending money identified in a security interest notification statement; provided, that in the case of a bank, “lender” means a bank that has an existing banking relationship with the debtor either due to an agricultural crop loan made within the preceding two (2) years, an existing farm or agricultural loan or mortgage or an existing deposit account;

“Letter of commitment” means a binding, irrevocable and unconditional agreement by a lender to honor drafts or other demands for payment upon the supplier presenting invoices signed by the purchaser or other proof of delivery;

“Person” means an individual or an organization and includes a corporation, firm or association;

“Petroleum product” means motor fuels and special fuels that are used in the production of crops, including “petroleum products,” as defined in § 67-3-902;

“Proceeds” means proceeds as defined in § 47-9-102;

“Seed” means agricultural seeds that are used to produce crops, including “agricultural seed,” as defined in § 43-10-103; and

“Supplier” means a person who furnishes agricultural production inputs.

Acts 1986, ch. 922, § 2.

43-31-103. Security interest notification statements — Response by lender.

A supplier, at the request of the debtor, may notify a lender of an agricultural production input security interest by providing a security interest notification statement to the lender in an envelope marked “IMPORTANT-LEGAL NOTICE.” Delivery of the notice must be made by certified mail or another verifiable method.

The security interest notification statement shall contain the following information:

The name and business address of the lender that is to receive notification;

The name and address of the supplier claiming the security interest;

A description and the date or anticipated date or dates of the transaction and the retail cost or anticipated costs of the agricultural production input;

The name, residential address, and signature of the person to whom the agricultural production input was or is to be furnished;

The name and residential address of the owner and a description of the real estate where the crops to which the security interest attaches are growing or are to be grown; and

A statement that the security interest notification statement shall not be considered as an application for credit as defined in the Equal Credit Opportunity Act, compiled in 15 U.S.C. §§ 1691-1691f.

Within fifteen (15) calendar days after receipt of a security interest notification statement, together with an authorization pursuant to § 45-10-105 signed by the person to whom the agricultural production input was or is to be furnished, a lender shall respond in writing to the supplier and to the person to whom the agricultural production input was or is to be furnished as follows:

Whether the lender has extended credit to the person to whom supplies were or are to be furnished to enable that person to produce crops during the then current or the next upcoming production season, and the amount of unexpended credit, if any, available to that person; and

Whether the lender has extended credit to the person, which credit is secured by or may be secured by a security interest in the crops of the then current or the next upcoming production season, by an after-acquired property clause or otherwise, and the date such credit was executed or given;

If the lender has extended credit to the person and there is unexpended credit available, upon authorization signed by that person, the lender shall make any advances on the unexpended credit payable jointly to that person and to the supplier, up to the amount stated in the authorization or the amount of unexpended credit, whichever is less;

If the lender has extended credit to the person but there are no funds unexpended, or if no credit has been extended to the person, whether the lender is interested in issuing a letter of commitment upon receipt of a loan application and compliance with any conditions for the issuance of a letter of commitment; and

Whether the lender has pending a credit application from the person to enable that person to produce crops during the then current or the next upcoming production season, and the amount applied for.

If a lender does not respond to a security interest notification statement within fifteen (15) calendar days of receipt, a supplier may deliver to the lender a second security interest notification statement, which shall state that it is a second notice. Within ten (10) calendar days after receipt of the second notice, the lender shall respond in writing as stated in subdivision (c)(1).

Notwithstanding §§ 47-9-204 and 47-9-324, if a lender does not timely respond to a second security interest notification statement, a perfected agricultural production input security interest corresponding to the security interest notification statement has priority over any security interest of the lender in the same crops or their proceeds; provided, that the supplier perfects such security interest within ten (10) days of its attachment.

Any response provided by a lender shall be adequate if it provides information that is within the knowledge of the lender as of the date of the response. No subsequent statement shall be required from the lender for information that arises after the date of the response.

The priority of a security interest in crops or their proceeds, of a lender who responds to a security interest notification statement or who is not required to respond, shall be governed solely by the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapter 9, and not by this chapter.

A security interest notification statement provided pursuant to subsection (c) shall be accompanied by a fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00); provided, that no fee shall be required for a second notification if the lender fails to respond to the first notification within the fifteen-day period.

Acts 1986, ch. 922, § 3; 2000, ch. 846, § 22a.

43-31-104. Extent of supplier's security interest — When it attaches.

A supplier who furnishes crop production inputs has an agricultural input security interest only as provided in this chapter for the unpaid retail cost of the crop production inputs. The security interest attaches to:

The existing crops upon the land where a furnished agricultural chemical was applied, or if crops are not planted, to the next production crop following the last date on which the agricultural chemical was applied;

The crops produced from furnished seed; or

The crops produced, harvested, or processed using a furnished petroleum product.

If the crops are grown on leased land and the lease provides for payment in crops, the security interest does not attach to the lessor's portion of the crops. The security interest continues in crop products and proceeds.

An agricultural input security interest attaches when the agricultural production inputs are furnished by the supplier to the purchaser.

Acts 1986, ch. 922, § 4.

43-31-105. Perfection of security interest — Financing statement — Unperfected security interests.

To perfect an agricultural production input security interest, the security interest must attach and the supplier entitled to the security interest must file a financing statement, with a copy of the security interest notification statement attached, with the appropriate filing officer under § 47-9-501.

The financing statement must indicate that the security interest is effective for eighteen (18) months after the date of filing. The financing statement and attached security interest notification statement may be removed from the filing systems eighteen (18) months after the date of filing, and may be physically destroyed after thirty (30) months from the date of filing.

The filing officer shall file, amend, and terminate the financing statement, and shall charge the fee for filing under this section in the manner provided by § 47-9-525 for a financing statement.

An agricultural production input security interest that is not perfected has the priority of an unperfected security interest under § 47-9-322.

Acts 1986, ch. 922, § 5; 2000, ch. 846, §§ 22b, 22c, 22d.

43-31-106. Enforcement of security interest.

The holder of an agricultural production input security interest may enforce the security interest in the manner provided in title 47, chapter 9, part 6. For enforcement of the security interest, the security interest holder is the secured party and person for whom the agricultural production input was furnished is the debtor, and each has the respective rights and duties of a secured party and a debtor under title 47, chapter 9, part 6.

Acts 1986, ch. 922, § 6; 2000, ch. 846, § 22e.